Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-416
Feral swine; applicability of sections; destruction; when.

The duties and liabilities imposed by sections 54-401 to 54-415 do not apply in the case of estray or trespass of feral swine as defined in section 37-524.01. Feral swine may be destroyed as provided in section 37-524.01.

Laws 2005, LB 20, § 2.